Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-506
Illegal activities regarding fish and game; extent of restrictions.

Whenever the possession, use, importation, storage, taxidermy for millinery purposes, sale, or offering or exposing for sale of fish or game is prohibited or restricted, the prohibition or restriction, when not specifically stated to be otherwise, shall mean any part of such fish or game.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 73, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 105, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-507.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 226;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 68.